District of Columbia statutes.
47-2826

Special events.

(a)

Owners, managers, or promoters of carnivals or fairs, by whatsoever name called, conducted for profit or gain, and not held in any building or structure licensed under this chapter, shall pay a license fee of $158 per day.

(b)

The Mayor may adjust the license fee set in subsection (a) of this section to cover the costs to the District of providing police, fire, and other public services that are necessary to protect public health and safety.

(c)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as an Entertainment endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

(d)

(1)

A person or entity granted a license in accordance with this section for an event where 100 or more attendees are anticipated shall provide infrastructure onsite for the separation and recycling of recyclable waste generated at the event.

(2)

A license holder who violates paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be subject to a fine of up to $ 5,000 per day.

(3)

The Mayor, pursuant to [Chapter 5 of Title 2 (§ 2-501 et seq.)], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subsection, including a fee to offset the cost of implementation.

(e)

(1)

There is established as a special fund the MPD Overtime Reimbursement Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Metropolitan Police Department (“MPD”) in accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection.

(2)

Except as provided in § 1-325.81, revenue from the following sources shall be deposited in the Fund:

(A)

Fees paid pursuant to this section related to police services; and

(B)

Fees paid pursuant to [§ 5-129.71].

(3)

Money in the Fund shall be used for the purpose of reimbursing MPD for the cost of overtime needed to:

(A)

Staff special events such as parades, carnivals, and movie productions; and

(B)

Provide security details to establishments, such as bars, nightclubs, and sports teams, that pay for extra police coverage.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 626, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 26
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 554, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(q), 23 DCR 2461
Mar. 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-224, § 2(a), 41 DCR 8055
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-234, § 2(a), 42 DCR 28
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 105, 43 DCR 4569
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(23), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(M), 50 DCR 6913
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9034, 58 DCR 6226
Aug. 8, 2014, D.C. Law 20-134, § 2, 61 DCR 6342
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 3003, 61 DCR 9990
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 10-361 provided that the Mayor shall establish by rule a schedule of license fees for special events held on public space to cover the costs to the District providing police, fire, and other public services that are necessary to protect public health and safety.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3003 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(M) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 rewrote (b); and added (e).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-134 added (d).
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (b), inserted “All funds received but not expended in a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.”
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (c), substituted “an Entertainment endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “a Class A Entertainment endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
1973 Ed., § 47-2326.
1981 Ed., § 47-2826.
This section is referenced in § 1-325.81.
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.